Washington statutes.
RCW 24.24.080

Right of corporations under the statutes.

Any corporation composed of fraternal organizations and/or members of fraternal organizations, heretofore incorporated under the laws of the state of Washington, may elect to subject [the] corporation and its capital stock and the rights of its stockholders therein to the provisions of this chapter by a majority vote of its trustees or directors and the unanimous assent or vote of the capital stock of such corporation.

If the unanimous written assent of the capital stock has not been obtained then the unanimous vote of all of the stockholders may be taken at any regular meeting of the stockholders or at any special meeting of the stockholders called for that purpose in the manner provided by the bylaws of such corporation for special meetings of the stockholders.

The president and secretary of such corporation shall certify said amendment in triplicate under the seal of such corporation as having been adopted by a majority vote of its trustees or directors and by the unanimous written assent or vote as the case may be of all of its stockholders, and file and keep the same as in the case of original articles; and from the time of filing said certificate such corporation and its capital stock and the rights of its stockholders therein shall be subject to all of the provisions of this chapter; PROVIDED, That nothing in this chapter shall affect the rights of the third person, pledgees of any shares of such capital stock, in such pledged stock, under pledges subsisting at the date of the filing of said amendment.

[ 1927 c 190 s 8; RRS s 3887-8.]